Utah statutes.
69-2-7.   Limitation of liabilities.

Except as provided in Section 69-2-8, nothing contained in this chapter imposes any duties or liabilities beyond those otherwise specified by law upon any provider of local exchange service, radio communications service, or terminal equipment needed to implement 911 emergency telephone service.



Amended by Chapter 86, 1996 General Session

